North Dakota, session 69, HB1397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State waltz.
"Dancing Dakota", written and composed by Chuck Suchy, is the North Dakota state waltz.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 54-54 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
State troubadour.
The chairman of the North Dakota council on the arts shall designate an individual to serve as the
official state troubadour or trobairitz for a term of five years. The chairman may fill any vacancy by
appointment for the unexpired portion of the term vacated.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. An official state troubadour must be appointed under section 2 of this
Act at the conclusion of any term of the inaugural troubadour appointed by resolution by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1397 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1397.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State